Tennessee, session 114, HB1129.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 54-1-128, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(e) Notwithstanding this section, the restrictions on borrow pits under
subdivisions (b)(1)(A)-(E) do not apply to temporary borrow pits used for a road work
construction project performed in a FEMA-certified county under a contract for
construction work entered into with the state that is part of a state or local Hurricane
Helene recovery effort. For purposes of this subsection (e), "FEMA-certified county"
means a county included in a declaration made on or after September 26, 2024, and
prior to October 3, 2024, for a disaster certified by the federal emergency management
agency (FEMA).
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1129
002210
- 1 -